Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.110

Effect of disincorporation—Streets.

Upon disincorporation of a city or town, its streets and highways pass to the control of the state and shall remain public highways until closed in pursuance of law; and the territory embraced therein shall be made into a new road district or annexed to adjoining districts as may be ordered by the board of county commissioners of the county embracing such city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.110. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 17; RRS s 8930.]